California, session 20252026, AB1269.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4032.5 is added to the Penal Code, to read:4032.5. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Wakiesha’s Law.(b) If an incarcerated person has died, the county or city jail shall notify all people covered by the current medical release of information form and the next of kin form within 24 hours.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In light of ongoing in-custody deaths and public concern regarding lack of timely communication, to ensure that the family members and loved ones of a person who dies while in custody are notified of the death without delay, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.